Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Compact

§ 2731.
Appointment of State members of board.

Eight persons shall represent the State as members of the board.
One board member shall be a member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate; one shall be a Representative, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; one board member shall be appointed by the Vermont Council on Higher Education, Inc.; and three shall be appointed by the Governor.
Each of the board members appointed under this section shall serve for a term of six years.
However, not more than two board members’ terms shall expire in any year, and appointments for terms of less than six years may be made as necessary for this purpose.
A board member may be appointed to fill the unexpired term of a member who dies, resigns, or becomes disqualified to serve.
The President of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and the presiding officer of the Vermont State Colleges Corporation shall be ex officio members of the board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 55

, § 3.

§ 2732.
Compensation of members.

The appointed members of the board shall receive $ 30.00 a day for the time actually spent in the performance of their duties, and all members of the board shall receive their actual and necessary expenses when away from home upon their official duties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1964, No. 22

(Sp. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 11, 1964;

1973, No. 92

, eff. April 24, 1973.

§ 2733.
Accounts.

The members from this State shall obtain accurate accounts of all the board’s receipts and disbursements.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 14, 2012.